Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2009
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Secretary of State's refusal to file document; appeal.

(1) If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document delivered to his or her office for filing, the domestic or foreign corporation may appeal the refusal within thirty days after the return of the document to the district court of Lancaster County. The appeal shall be commenced by petitioning the court to compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the Secretary of State's explanation of his or her refusal to file.

(2) The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to file the document or take other action the court considers appropriate.

(3) The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 9.